Maine, session 132, LD1787.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1122, sub-§9, as amended by PL 2007, c. 571, §10, is further
amended to read:
9. Seed money contribution. "Seed money contribution" means, for a gubernatorial
participating candidate, a contribution of no more than $250 per individual made to the
participating candidate, including the candidate or the candidate's spouse or domestic
partner. For any other participating candidate, "seed money contribution" means a
contribution of no more than $100 per individual made to a the participating candidate,
including the candidate or the candidate's spouse or domestic partner.
Page 1 - 132LR2046(03)